Utah statutes.
48-2e-911.   Withdrawal of registration of registered foreign limited partnership.

(1)  A registered foreign limited partnership may withdraw its registration by delivering a statement of withdrawal to the division for filing.  The statement of withdrawal must state:

(a)  the name of the foreign limited partnership and its jurisdiction of formation;

(b)  that the foreign limited partnership is not doing business in this state and that it withdraws its registration to do business in this state;

(c)  that the foreign limited partnership revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf in this state; and

(d)  an address to which service of process may be made under Subsection (2).

(2)  After the withdrawal of the registration of a partnership, service of process in any action or proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign limited partnership was registered to do business in this state may be made pursuant to Subsection 16-17-301(2).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

